HunSpellDictionaries/uk_UA.dic
вдати/KL
вдіти/KL
видістатися/L
відібрати/KL
відідрати/KL
влити/KL
всістися/LX
дати/KL
діти/KL
додати/KL
домолоти/KL
завдати/KL
задітися/L
заподітися/L
запродати/KL
збити/KL
звикнутися/L
здати/KL
злипнутися/L
злити/KL
змолоти/KL
зостатися/L
зсохнути/KLEF
зустріти/KL
молоти/KLGH
надати/KL
надіти/KL
напосісти/KL
насісти/KL
оббити/KL
обдатися/L
обібратися/L
обігнатися/L
облити/KL
одбити/KL
осістися/L
передати/KL
перемолоти/KL
пересістися/L
перестріти/KL
підвити/KL
піддати/KL
підібрати/KL
підлити/KL
повстати/KL
подати/KL
постати/KL
придатися/L
продати/KL
розвити/KL
роздати/KL
розібрати/KL
розлити/KL
розпитися/L
розпродати/KL
розсістися/L
розстатися/L
спитися/L
спухнути/KLEF
стати/KL
стріти/KL
увібрати/KL
удати/KL
